test/src/morphology/N-fijool_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - fijōl: # Noun 233 'eng /est viiul/fin' - full paradigm
     fijōl+N+Sg+Nom: fijōl
     fijōl+N+Sg+Gen: fijōl
     fijōl+N+Sg+Par: fijōlt
     fijōl+N+Sg+Dat: fijōlõn
     fijōl+N+Sg+Ins: fijōlõks
     fijōl+N+Sg+Ill: fijōlõ
     fijōl+N+Sg+Ela: fijōlõst
     fijōl+N+Pl+Nom: fijōld
     fijōl+N+Pl+Gen: fijōld
     fijōl+N+Pl+Par: fijōļi
     fijōl+N+Pl+Dat: fijōldõn
     fijōl+N+Pl+Ins: fijōldõks
     fijōl+N+Pl+Ill: fijōļiž
     fijōl+N+Pl+Ela: fijōļist
